notebooks/Latvian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc

LEXICON Root						
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

vēj N1dekl;
zēn N1dekl;
dzīvniek N1dekl;

šķīv N2dekl;
ez N2dekl;
ron N2dekl;

mas N4dekl;
jūr N4dekl;
alg N4dekl;


LEXICON N1dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^s  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^am # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os # ;

LEXICON N2dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^is  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^Ma  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^im #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^Mi  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^Miem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^Mus #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^Mos #;

LEXICON N4dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^a  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^as #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ai #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^as  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ām #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^as #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ās #;
